Montana, session 2025, SB374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Violation of gag order not contempt. (1) Violating a gag order is not
contempt of the authority of the court if the person has rightfully proclaimed the person's first amendment rights
under the United States constitution and has not clearly and with purposeful intention violated another person's
right to privacy.
(2) A gag order may not be construed to prevent prejudicing a potential jury or a judge who
conducts a bench trial.
(3) Criticism of court proceedings or orders is not contempt of the authority of the court if the
criticism asserts the court violated state or federal law or the United States or Montana constitution.

Section 2. Section 3-1-501, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-501. What acts or omissions are contempts -- civil and criminal contempt. (1) The Except
as provided in subsection (8), following acts or omissions in respect to a court of justice or proceedings in a
court of justice are contempts of the authority of the court:
(a) disorderly, contemptuous, or insolent behavior toward the judge while holding the court tending
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
to interrupt the due course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;
(b) a breach of the peace, boisterous conduct, or violent disturbance tending to interrupt the due
course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;
(c) misbehavior in office or other willful neglect or violation of duty by an attorney, counsel, clerk,
sheriff, coroner, or other person appointed or elected to perform a judicial or ministerial service;
(d) deceit or abuse of the process or proceedings of the court by a party to an action or special
proceeding;
(e) disobedience of any lawful judgment, order, or process of the court;
(f) assuming to be an officer, attorney, or counsel of a court and acting as that individual without
authority;
(g) rescuing any person or property in the custody of an officer by virtue of an order or process of
the court;
(h) unlawfully detaining a witness or party to an action while going to, remaining at, or returning
from the court where the action is on the calendar for trial;
(i) any other unlawful interference with the process or proceedings of a court;
(j) disobedience of a subpoena duly served or refusing to be sworn or answer as a witness;
(k) when summoned as a juror in a court, neglecting to attend or serve as a juror or improperly
conversing with a party to an action to be tried at the court or with any other person in relation to the merits of
the action or receiving a communication from a party or other person in respect to it without immediately
disclosing the communication to the court;
(l) disobedience by a lower tribunal, magistrate, or officer of the lawful judgment, order, or process
of a superior court or proceeding in an action or special proceeding contrary to law after the action or special
proceeding is removed from the jurisdiction of the lower tribunal, magistrate, or officer.
(2) Disobedience of the lawful orders or process of a judicial officer is also a contempt of the
authority of the officer.
(3) A contempt may be either civil or criminal. A contempt is civil if the sanction imposed seeks to
force the contemnor's compliance with a court order. A contempt is criminal if the court's purpose in imposing
the penalty is to punish the contemnor for a specific act and to vindicate the authority of the court. If the penalty
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
imposed is incarceration, a fine, or both, the contempt is civil if the contemnor can end the incarceration or
avoid the fine by complying with a court order and is criminal if the contemnor cannot end the incarceration or
avoid the fine by complying with a court order. If the court's purpose in imposing the sanction is to attempt to
compel the contemnor's performance of an act, the court shall impose the sanction under 3-1-520 and may not
impose a sanction under 45-7-309.
(4) A person may be found guilty of and penalized for criminal contempt by proof beyond a
reasonable doubt. The Except as provided in subsections (5) through (9), the procedures provided in Title 46
apply to criminal contempt prosecutions, except those under 3-1-511.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6), a fine for civil or criminal contempt may not exceed $50 a
day and $500 in total.
(6) If the contemnor shows by affidavit prejudice, bias, or misconduct by the court, a fine or
incarceration must be immediately stopped until a hearing is conducted on the affidavit. Another judge shall
conduct the hearing on the affidavit.
(7) A person charged with civil or criminal contempt under this section for whom incarceration is
ordered may not be incarcerated for more than 3 days without the right to request a jury trial.
(8) A contemnor who challenges an order or judgment as being unlawful is not guilty of contempt
until after a hearing to determine whether the order is lawful.
(9) A law enforcement officer who does not obey an unlawful order is not guilty of contempt.
Contempt by a law enforcement officer is immediately subject to independent review of the contempt order by
another judge. A law enforcement officer found to have disobeyed a lawful order may not be incarcerated but
may be fined."

Section 3. Section 3-1-511, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-511. Procedure -- contempt committed in presence of court. (1) When a contempt is
committed in the immediate view and presence of the court or judge at chambers and the contemptuous
conduct requires immediate action in order to restore order, maintain the dignity or authority of the court, or
prevent delay, it may be punished summarily. An order must be made reciting the facts that occurred in the
judge's immediate view and presence and adjudging that the person proceeded against is guilty of a contempt
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
and that the person must be punished as prescribed in the order. An order may not be issued unless the person
proceeded against has been informed of the contempt and given an opportunity to defend or explain the
person's conduct. A Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), a person may be adjudged guilty of and
penalized for criminal contempt under this section by a fine in an amount not to exceed $50 a day or $500 in
total or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 30 days, or both, and by any other reasonable conditions or
restrictions that the court may consider appropriate under the circumstances.
(2) If the contemnor shows by affidavit prejudice, bias, or misconduct by the court, a fine or
incarceration must be immediately stopped until a hearing is conducted on the affidavit. Another judge shall
conduct the hearing on the affidavit.
(3) A person charged with civil or criminal contempt under this section for whom incarceration is
ordered may not be incarcerated for more than 3 days without the right to request a jury trial."

Section 4. Section 3-1-520, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-520. Penalty to compel performance. (1) When Except as provided in subsections (2) through
(4), when the sanction imposed for a contempt seeks to compel the contemnor to perform an act that is in the
power of the contemnor to perform, the contemnor may be incarcerated, subjected to a fine in an amount not to
exceed $50 a day or $500 in total, or both, until the contemnor has performed the act. The act must be
specified in the warrant of commitment.
(2) If the contemnor shows by affidavit prejudice, bias, or misconduct by the court, a fine or
incarceration must be immediately stopped until a hearing is conducted on the affidavit. Another judge shall
conduct the hearing on the affidavit.
(3) A person charged with civil or criminal contempt under this section for whom incarceration is
ordered may not be incarcerated for more than 3 days without the right to request a jury trial.
(4) A gag order or injunction for which a violation is punishable by contempt is subject to strict
scrutiny as to violation of the first amendment to the United States constitution. The state's interest as to privacy
or the possible prejudice of a potential jury or the public may not supersede the interests of the person claiming
free speech, particularly if the criticism is about the unlawfulness of the contempt order or prejudice, bias, or
misconduct by the judge."
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1

Section 5. Section 3-1-523, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-523. Judgment and orders in contempt cases final -- family law exception exceptions. (1)
The Except as provided in subsection (3), the judgment and orders of the court or judge made in cases of
contempt are final and conclusive. Except as provided in subsection (2), there is no appeal, but the action of a
district court or judge can be reviewed on a writ of certiorari by the supreme court or a justice of the supreme
court and the action of a justice of the peace or other court of limited jurisdiction can be reviewed by the district
court or judge of the county in which the justice or judge of the court of limited jurisdiction resides.
(2) A party may appeal a contempt judgment or order in a family law proceeding only when the
judgment or order appealed from includes an ancillary order that affects the substantial rights of the parties
involved.
(3) (a) The judgment and orders of the court or judge, including by an administrative judge or as
the result of a jury trial, holding a person in contempt are not final and conclusive if the contemnor shows the
order violates the contemnor's rights under the first amendment to the United States constitution by affidavit of
prejudice, bias, or misconduct by the court issuing the order. If incarcerated, the contemnor must be released
after the affidavit is filed. Another judge shall review the contempt order and the affidavit within 3 days of the
affidavit filing date. The contemnor may request a substitution of judges if the contemnor believes the second
judge is guilty of prejudice, bias, or misconduct.
(b) An order of contempt issued by an administrative judge or in a city court, municipal court, or
justice court for which the contemnor files an affidavit under subsection (3)(a) may be appealed to district court
for legal review.
(c) An order of contempt issued in a district court for which the contemnor files an affidavit under
subsection (3)(a) may be appealed to the supreme court.
(4) A person may publicly protest or criticize a contempt order, including in the presence of the
court, if the protest or criticism:
(a) does not include statements that the contempt order is unlawful; and
(b) is done without reckless disregard for the truth."

- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
Section 6. Section 3-10-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-10-402. Proceedings. When a contempt is committed, whether or not it is in the immediate view
and presence of the justice, the procedures contained in 3-1-501(3) and (4), 3-1-511 through 3-1-518, and 3-1-
520 through 3-1-523 apply."

Section 7. Section 3-11-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-11-303. Contempts city judge may punish for -- procedure. (1) A city judge may punish for
contempt persons guilty of only the following acts:
(a) disorderly, contemptuous, or insolent behavior toward the judge while holding the court tending
to interrupt the due course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;
(b) a breach of the peace, boisterous conduct, or violent disturbance in the presence of the judge
or in the immediate vicinity of the court held by the judge tending to interrupt the due course of a trial or other
judicial proceeding;
(c) disobedience or resistance to the execution of a lawful order or process made or issued by the
judge;
(d) disobedience to a subpoena served or refusal to be sworn or to answer as a witness;
(e) rescuing any person or property in the custody of an officer by virtue of an order or process of
the court.
(2) The procedures contained in 3-1-501(3) and (4), 3-1-511 through 3-1-518, and 3-1-520 through
3-1-523 apply."

Section 8. Section 37-61-210, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-61-210. Penalty for practicing without license. (1) If any person practices law in any court,
except a justice's court or a city court, without having received a license as attorney, the person is guilty of a
contempt of court.
(2) A person acting as an adviser and appearing with a plaintiff, defendant, objector, or petitioner
who has not deceptively told the plaintiff, defendant, objector, or petitioner that the person is an attorney may
advise or give legal information to a plaintiff, defendant, objector, or petitioner and is not guilty of practicing law
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
or of contempt. No civil or criminal contempt may be issued if the court, on investigation, is convinced that no
deception has been done and the advisor is appearing with full permission by the plaintiff, defendant, objector,
or petitioner."

Section 9. Section 45-7-309, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-7-309. Criminal contempt. (1) A person commits the offense of criminal contempt when the
person knowingly engages in any of the following conduct:
(a) disorderly, contemptuous, or insolent behavior committed during the sitting of a court in its
immediate view and presence and directly tending to interrupt its proceedings or to impair the respect due to its
authority;
(b) breach of the peace, noise, or other disturbance directly tending to interrupt a court's
proceeding;
(c) purposely disobeying or refusing any lawful process or other mandate of a court;
(d) unlawfully refusing to be sworn as a witness in any court proceeding or, after being sworn,
refusing to answer any legal and proper interrogatory;
(e) purposely publishing a false or grossly inaccurate report of a court's proceeding;
(f) purposely failing to obey any mandate, process, or notice relative to juries issued pursuant to
Title 3, chapter 15; or
(g) purposely failing to comply with the requirements of the 24/7 sobriety and drug monitoring
program provided for in Title 44, chapter 4, part 12, if ordered by a court to participate in the program.
(2) A Subject to subsection (3), a person convicted of the offense of criminal contempt shall be
fined not to exceed $500 or be imprisoned in the county jail for a term not to exceed 6 months 30 days, or both.
(3) A person may only be imprisoned for more than 3 days after a trial by jury resulting in a verdict
of guilty beyond a reasonable doubt.
(4) A contemnor who challenges an order or judgment as being unlawful is not guilty of criminal
contempt until after a hearing to determine whether the order is lawful.
(5) A law enforcement officer who does not obey an unlawful order is not guilty of criminal
contempt. Criminal contempt by a law enforcement officer is immediately subject to independent review of the
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 374.1
contempt order by another judge. A law enforcement officer found to have disobeyed a lawful order may not be
incarcerated but may be fined."

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 3, chapter 1, part 5, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 1, part 5, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 374